North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-41 Industrial Hemp [Repealed]

4-41-01.
Industrial hemp (cannabis sativa l.) — Oilseed. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 65, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-41-02.
Industrial hemp — Licensure — Reporting requirements — Continuing appropriation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 65, § 2; 2005, ch. 111, § 1; 2007, ch. 20, § 7; 2007, ch. 69, § 1; 2009, ch. 79, §
1; 2015, ch. 67, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 66, § 1, effective March 15, 2017.

4-41-03.
Industrial hemp seed — Authorized activity — Research. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 70, § 1; 2015, ch. 67, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.